lez_conj.lexd
PATTERN Conjunction
CConj [<conj>:]
SConj [<conj>:]

LEXICON CConj
амма # но
ва # и
гьакӀ # также
гьакӀни # также
гьам # также
йа # или
ни # и
хьиз # как
я # ил

LEXICON SConj
вилик # раньше
гуьгъуьниз # после
гьавиляй # потому, поэтому
гьахьняй # поэтому
кьулухъ # после
лагьай
лагьана
лугьуз
мус # когда
нагагь # если
хьи
эгер # если
ятӀа
